Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:School districts may not censor or restrict instruction in United States or Washington state history or heritage based on religious references in original source documents, writings, speeches, proclamations, or records, including:(1) The Mayflower compact;(2) The Declaration of Independence;(3) The Constitution of the United States;(4) The Washington state Constitution;(5) The preambles and constitutions of other states within the United States;(6) The Northwest Ordinance of 1787;(7) The Federalist Papers;(8) The Pledge of Allegiance;(9) The national anthem;(10) George Washington's farewell address to the nation;(11) Abraham Lincoln's Gettysburg address;(12) United States' presidential proclamations; and(13) Patrick Henry's speeches.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act may be known and cited as the American heritage act for Washington state.--- END ---